District of Columbia statutes.
42-2406

Validity of loan documents.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any loan documents.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-187, § 7, 33 DCR 7681
1981 Ed., § 45-2806.